North Carolina statutes. Chapter 94. Apprenticeship.
§§ 94-1 through 94-12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017.

History.

G.S. 94-1

; 1939, c. 229, s. 1; 1979, c. 673, s. 1; 2013-330, s. 2(c); repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-2; 1939, c. 229, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1977, c. 896; 2013-330, s. 2(c); repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-3; 1939, c. 229, s. 3; 2013-330, s. 2(c); repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-4; 1939, c. 229, s. 4; 1951, c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, c. 673, s. 2; 2013-330, s. 2(c); repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-5; 1939, c. 229, s. 5; 1979, c. 673, s. 3; repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-6; 1939, c. 229, s. 6; 1979, c. 479, ss. 1, 2; c. 673, s. 4; 2013-330, s. 2(c); repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-7; 1939, c. 229, s. 7; 1945, c. 729, s. 1; 1977, c. 550, s. 1; 1979, c. 673, s. 5; repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-8; 1939, c. 229, s. 8; 1977, c. 550, s. 2; repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 94-9; 1939, c. 229, s. 9; repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017.

G.S. 94-1

1; 1939, c. 229, s. 11; 1945, c. 729, s. 3; repealed by 2017-57, s. 15.13(b), effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 94-1

pertained to purpose. Former G.S. 94-2 pertained to apprenticeship council. Former G.S. 94-3 pertained to director of apprenticeship. Former G.S. 94-4 pertained to powers and duties of director of apprenticeship. Former G.S. 94-5 pertained to apprenticeship committees and program sponsors. Former G.S. 94-6 pertained to definition of an apprentice. Former G.S. 94-7 pertained to contents of agreement. Former G.S. 94-8 pertained to approval of apprentice agreements; signatures. Former G.S. 94-9 pertained to rotation of employment. Former

G.S. 94-1

1 pertained to limitation.

Former G.S. 94-10 was repealed by Session Laws 1945, c. 729, s. 2.

Former G.S. 94-12, which pertained to fees, was repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 15.13, effective July 1, 2015.

Former G.S. 94-2 was amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 14.1(o), effective July 1, 2017. The amendment would have substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, and the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources”
for “legislature” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 15.13(a), provides: “(a) All functions, powers, duties, obligations, resources, and appropriations vested in the Apprenticeship Program and the Apprenticeship Council are transferred to, vested in, and consolidated into the North Carolina Community Colleges System Office as a Type I transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. The State Board of Community Colleges, the Community Colleges System Office, and the Office of State Budget and Management are authorized to take all other steps necessary to consolidate the Apprenticeship Program and the Apprenticeship Council into the Community Colleges System Office. Joint delivery of Apprenticeship and Community College workforce training programs shall ensure coordination of program delivery and appropriate classroom training supporting the needs of students and employers.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 15.13(d), (e), provides: “(d) Notwithstanding

G.S. 115D-11.6

, as enacted by this section, the current members serving on the Apprenticeship Council pursuant to G.S. 94-2 as of July 1, 2017, shall serve the remainder of their terms. Thereafter, as terms expire, or when a vacancy occurs prior to the expiration of a term, members of the Apprenticeship Council shall be appointed by the State Board of Community Colleges in accordance with

G.S. 115D-11.6

, as enacted by this section.

“(e) Within 90 days of the date this act becomes law, the Department of Commerce shall submit a Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act State Plan amendment to the United States Department of Labor to designate the Community Colleges System Office as the State agency responsible for the administration of ApprenticeshipNC as provided for in this section.” This Act became effective July 1, 2017.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-330, s. 2(c), effective January 1, 2014, substituted
“Department of Commerce” for “Department of Labor” near the end of this section.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on this Chapter, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 327 (1939).